California statutes. Insurance Code
A disability policy shall contain a provision that shall be in one of the two forms set forth in this section. Policies other than noncancellable policies shall use Form A. Noncancellable policies shall use either Form A or Form B. In Form B, the clause in parentheses in paragraph (a) may be omitted at the insurer’s option. Paragraph (a) in Form A shall not be so construed as to affect any legal requirement for avoidance of a policy or denial of a claim during the initial two-year period, nor to limit the application of Sections 10369.2 to 10369.6, inclusive, in the event of misstatement with respect to age or occupation or other insurance.

Form A.

Time Limit on Certain Defenses:(a) After two years from the date of issue of this policy, no misstatements, except fraudulent misstatements, made by the applicant in the application for the policy shall be used to void the policy or to deny a claim for loss incurred or disability (as defined in the policy) commencing after the expiration of the two-year period.

(b) No claim for loss incurred or disability (as defined in the policy) commencing after two years from the date of issue of this policy shall be reduced or denied on the ground that a disease or physical condition not excluded from coverage by name or specific description effective on the date of loss had existed prior to the effective date of coverage of this policy.

Form B.

Incontestable:(a) After this policy has been in force for a period of two years during the lifetime of the insured (excluding any period during which the insured is disabled), it shall become incontestable as to the statements contained in the application.

(b) No claim for loss incurred or disability (as defined in the policy) commencing after two years from the date of issue of this policy shall be reduced or denied on the ground that a disease or physical condition not excluded from coverage by name or specific description effective on the date of loss had existed prior to the effective date of coverage of this policy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 470.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

10350.3.

A disability policy shall contain a provision which shall be in one of the two forms set forth herein. Form A shall be used in a policy in which the insurer does not reserve the right to refuse any renewal. Form B shall be used in a policy in which an insurer reserves the right to refuse any renewal. The clause in parentheses may only be added if the policy contains a cancellation provision. In the blank in each such form shall be inserted a number; not less than “7” for weekly premium policies, “10” for monthly premium policies, and “31” for all other policies.

Form A.

Grace Period: A grace period of __ days will be granted for the payment of each premium falling due after the first premium, during which grace period the policy shall continue in force (subject to the right of the insurer to cancel in accordance with the cancellation provision hereof).

Form B.

Grace Period: Unless not less than five days prior to the premium due date the insurer has delivered to the insured or has mailed to his last address as shown by the records of the insurer written notice of its intention not to renew this policy beyond the period for which the premium has been accepted, a grace period of __ days will be granted for the payment of each premium falling due after the first premium, during which grace period the policy shall continue in force (subject to the right of the insurer to cancel in accordance with the cancellation provision hereof).

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 570.)
-------------------------------------------

10350.4.

A disability policy shall contain a provision which shall be in the form set forth herein. The last sentence of such provision may be omitted from a noncancellable policy.

Reinstatement: If any renewal premium be not paid within the time granted the insured for payment, a subsequent acceptance of premium by the insurer or by any agent duly authorized by the insurer to accept such premium, without requiring in connection therewith an application for reinstatement, shall reinstate the policy; provided, however, that if the insurer or such agent requires an application for reinstatement and issues a conditional receipt for the premium tendered, the policy will be reinstated upon approval of such application by the insurer or, lacking such approval, upon the forty-fifth day following the date of such conditional receipt unless the insurer has previously notified the insured in writing of its disapproval of such application. The reinstated policy shall cover only loss resulting from such accidental injury as may be sustained after the date of reinstatement and loss due to such sickness as may begin more than 10 days after such date. In all other respects the insured and insurer shall have the same rights thereunder as they had under the policy immediately before the due date of the defaulted premium, subject to any provisions endorsed hereon or attached hereto in connection with the reinstatement. Any premium accepted in connection with a reinstatement shall be applied to a period for which premium has not been previously paid, but not to any period more than 60 days prior to the date of reinstatement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 570.)
-------------------------------------------

10350.5.

A disability policy shall contain a provision which shall be in one of the two forms set forth herein. Form A may be used in any policy. Form B may be used by an insurer, at its option, in a policy providing a loss of time benefit which may be payable for at least two years. In the blank space of such provision shall be inserted the location of such office or offices as the insurer may designate for the purpose of giving notice of claim.

Form A.

Notice of Claim: Written notice of claim must be given to the insurer within 20 days after the occurrence or commencement of any loss covered by the policy, or as soon thereafter as is reasonably possible. Notice given by or on behalf of the insured or the beneficiary to the insurer at ____, or to any authorized agent of the insurer, with information sufficient to identify the insured, shall be deemed notice to the insurer.

Form B.

Notice of Claim: Written notice of claim must be given to the insurer within 20 days after the occurrence or commencement of any loss covered by the policy, or as soon thereafter as is reasonably possible. Subject to the qualifications set forth below, if the insured suffers loss of time on account of disability for which indemnity may be payable for at least two years, he shall, at least once in every six months after having given notice of claim, give to the insurer notice of continuance of said disability, except in the event of legal incapacity. The period of six months following any filing of proof by the insured or any payment by the insurer on account of such claim or any denial of liability in whole or in part by the insurer shall be excluded in applying this provision. Delay in the giving of such notice shall not impair the insured’s right to any indemnity which would otherwise have accrued during the period of six months preceding the date on which such notice is actually given. Notice given by or on behalf of the insured or the beneficiary to the insurer at ____, or to any authorized agent of the insurer, with information sufficient to identify the insured, shall be deemed notice to the insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 570.)
-------------------------------------------

10350.6.

A disability policy shall contain a provision which shall be in the form set forth herein.

Claim Forms: The insurer, upon receipt of a notice of claim, will furnish to the claimant such forms as are usually furnished by it for filing proofs of loss. If such forms are not furnished within 15 days after the giving of such notice the claimant shall be deemed to have complied with the requirements of this policy as to proof of loss upon submitting, within the time fixed in the policy for filing proofs of loss, written proof covering the occurrence, the character and the extent of the loss for which claim is made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 570.)
-------------------------------------------

10350.7.

A disability policy shall contain a provision which shall be in the form set forth herein.

Proofs of Loss: Written proof of loss must be furnished to the insurer at its said office in case of claim for loss for which this policy provides any periodic payment contingent upon continuing loss within 90 days after the termination of the period for which the insurer is liable and in case of claim for any other loss within 90 days after the date of such loss. Failure to furnish such proof within the time required shall not invalidate nor reduce any claim if it was not reasonably possible to give proof within such time, provided such proof is furnished as soon as reasonably possible and in no event, except in the absence of legal capacity, later than one year from the time proof is otherwise required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 570.)
-------------------------------------------

10350.8.

A disability policy shall contain a provision which shall be in the form set forth herein. In the blank of such provision will be inserted the period for payment which must not be less frequently than monthly.

Time of Payment of Claim: Indemnities payable under this policy for any loss other than loss for which this policy provides any periodic payment will be paid immediately upon receipt of due written proof of such loss. Subject to due written proof of loss, all accrued indemnities for loss for which this policy provides periodic payment will be paid ____ and any balance remaining unpaid upon the termination of liability will be paid immediately upon receipt of due written proof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 570.)
-------------------------------------------

10350.9.

A disability policy shall contain a provision which shall include the following first paragraph and which may, at the option of the insurer, include either or both of the following second and third paragraphs. If the provision contains the second paragraph, there shall be inserted in the blank an amount which shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).

Payment of Claims: Indemnity for loss of life will be payable in accordance with the beneficiary designation and the provisions respecting such payment which may be prescribed herein and effective at the time of payment. If no such designation or provision is then effective, such indemnity shall be payable to the estate of the insured. Any other accrued indemnities unpaid at the insured’s death may, at the option of the insurer, be paid either to such beneficiary or to such estate. All other indemnities will be payable to the insured.

If any indemnity of this policy shall be payable to the estate of the insured, or to an insured or beneficiary who is a minor or otherwise not competent to give a valid release, the insurer may pay such indemnity, up to an amount not exceeding $____, to any relative by blood or connection by marriage of the insured or beneficiary who is deemed by the insurer to be equitably entitled thereto. Any payment made by the insurer in good faith pursuant to this provision shall fully discharge the insurer to the extent of such payment.

Subject to any written direction of the insured in the application or otherwise all or a portion of any indemnities provided by this policy on account of hospital, nursing, medical, or surgical services may, at the insurer’s option and unless the insured requests otherwise in writing not later than the time of filing proofs of that loss, be paid directly to the person or persons having paid for the hospitalization or medical or surgical aid, or to the hospital or person rendering those services; but it is not required that the service be rendered by a particular hospital or person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 744, Sec. 2.6.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

10350.10.

A disability policy shall contain a provision which shall be in the form set forth herein.

Physical Examinations and Autopsy: The insurer at its own expense shall have the right and opportunity to examine the person of the insured when and as often as it may reasonably require during the pendency of a claim hereunder and to make an autopsy in case of death where it is not forbidden by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 570.)
-------------------------------------------

10350.11.

A disability policy shall contain a provision which shall be in the form set forth herein.

Legal Actions: No action at law or in equity shall be brought to recover on this policy prior to the expiration of 60 days after written proof of loss has been furnished in accordance with the requirements of this policy. No such action shall be brought after the expiration of three years after the time written proof of loss is required to be furnished.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 570.)
-------------------------------------------

10350.12.

A disability policy shall contain a provision which shall be in the form set forth herein. At the insurer’s option, the clause of such provision which precedes the first comma may be omitted.

Change of Beneficiary: Unless the insured makes an irrevocable designation of beneficiary, the right to change of beneficiary is reserved to the insured and the consent of the beneficiary or beneficiaries shall not be requisite to surrender or assignment of this policy or to any change of beneficiary or beneficiaries, or to any other changes in this policy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 570.)
-------------------------------------------

10351.

Each policy of disability insurance issued or renewed on or after the effective date of this section, shall provide, where feasible, that benefits for confinement in an extended care facility, as defined in subsection (j) of Section 1395x of Title 42 of the United States Code, may be provided under such terms and conditions as may be agreed upon between the insured, or group policyholder, and the insurer.

Nothing in this section shall preclude a disability insurance policy from providing benefits for confinement in institutions other than extended care facilities as defined in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 522.)
-------------------------------------------

10353.

(a) Every policy of disability insurance issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 1992, that offers coverage for perinatal services shall contain a provision providing for direct reimbursement to certified nurse-midwives and nurse practitioners for perinatal services. The certified nurse-midwife or nurse practitioner may collect payment for any unpaid portion of his or her fee, as provided for under the plan for other providers. 

(b) For purposes of this section, “direct reimbursement” means that after the enrollee files a claim for the perinatal service provided by the certified nurse-midwife or nurse practitioner, the plan pays the certified nurse-midwife or nurse practitioner directly.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 870, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10354.

(a) (1) Every policy of disability insurance issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 1994, that offers coverage for perinatal services shall contain a provision for direct reimbursement to licensed midwives for perinatal services rendered under terms and conditions as may be agreed upon between the policyholder and the insurer.

(2) The licensed midwife may collect payment for any unpaid portion of his or her fee, as provided under the policy for other providers.

(3) Reasonable consideration shall be given to licensed midwives by disability insurers contracting for services at alternative rates. For the purposes of this section, “reasonable consideration” shall have the meaning provided in Section 10180.

(b) For purposes of this section, “direct reimbursement” means that after the policyholder files a claim for the perinatal service provided under those terms and conditions as may be agreed upon between the policyholder and the insurer, the insurer pays the licensed midwife directly.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1280, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Optional Standard Provisions and Special Provisions—Uniform Provisions [10369.1. - 10369.12.]

10369.1.

Except as provided in Section 10323, no disability policy delivered or issued for delivery to any person in this State shall contain provisions respecting the matters set forth in Sections 10369.2 to 10369.12, inclusive, unless such provisions are in the words in which the same appear in such sections; provided, however, that the insurer may, at its option, use in lieu of any such provision a corresponding provision of different wording approved by the commissioner, which is not less favorable in any respect to the insured or the beneficiary. Any such provision contained in the policy shall be preceded individually by the appropriate caption appearing in each of such sections or, at the option of the insurer, by such appropriate individual or group captions or subcaptions as the commissioner may approve.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 570.)
-------------------------------------------

10369.2.

A disability policy may contain a provision in the form set forth herein.

Change of Occupation: If the insured be injured or contract sickness after having changed his occupation to one classified by the insurer as more hazardous than that stated in this policy or while doing for compensation anything pertaining to an occupation so classified, the insurer will pay only such portion of the indemnities provided in this policy as the premium paid would have purchased at the rates and within the limits fixed by the insurer for such more hazardous occupation. If the insured changes his occupation to one classified by the insurer as less hazardous than that stated in this policy, the insurer, upon receipt of proof of such change of occupation, will reduce the premium rate accordingly, and will return the excess pro-rata unearned premium from the date of change of occupation or from the policy anniversary date immediately preceding receipt of such proof, whichever is the more recent. In applying this provision, the classification of occupational risk and the premium rates shall be such as have been last filed by the insurer prior to the occurrence of the loss for which the insurer is liable or prior to date of proof of change in occupation with the state official having supervision of insurance in the state where the insured resided at the time this policy was issued; but if such filing was not required, then the classification of occupational risk and the premium rates shall be those last made effective by the insurer in such state prior to the occurrence of the loss or prior to the date of proof of change in occupation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 570.)
-------------------------------------------

10369.3.

A disability policy may contain a provision in the form set forth herein.

Misstatement of Age: If the age of the insured has been misstated, all amounts payable under this policy shall be such as the premium paid would have purchased at the correct age.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 570.)
-------------------------------------------

10369.4.

A disability policy may contain a provision which shall, at the option of the insurer, be in one of the two forms set forth herein. If Form A is used, there shall be inserted in the first blank the type of coverage or coverages and in the second blank the maximum limit of indemnity or indemnities.

Form A.

Other Insurance in This Insurer: If an accident or sickness or accident and sickness policy or policies previously issued by the insurer to the insured be in force concurrently herewith, making the aggregate indemnity for ____ in excess of $____, the excess insurance shall be void and all premiums paid for such excess shall be returned to the insured or to his estate.

Form B.

Other Insurance in This Insurer: Insurance effective at any one time on the insured under a like policy or policies in this insurer is limited to the one such policy elected by the insured, his beneficiary or his estate, as the case may be, and the insurer will return all premiums paid for all other such policies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 570.)
-------------------------------------------

10369.5.

A disability policy may contain a provision in the form set forth in this section. If the provision also contains the provision set forth in Section 10369.6, there shall be added to its caption the phrase, “***expense incurred benefits.” The insurer may, at its option, include in this provision a definition of “other valid coverage,” approved as to form by the commissioner. The definition shall be limited in subject matter to coverage provided by organizations subject to regulation by insurance law or by insurance authorities of this or any other state of the United States or any province of Canada, or by hospital or medical service organizations, and to any other coverage, the inclusion of which may be approved by the commissioner. In the absence of that definition, the terms shall not include group insurance, automobile medical payments insurance, or coverage provided by hospital or medical service organizations or by union welfare plans or employer or employee benefit organizations. For the purpose of applying this policy provision with respect to any insured, any amount of benefit provided for the insured pursuant to any compulsory benefit statute, including any workers’ compensation or employers’ liability statute, whether provided by a governmental agency or otherwise, shall in all cases be deemed to be “other valid coverage” of which the insurer has had notice. In applying this provision, no third party liability coverage shall be included as “other valid coverage.”

Insurance With Other Insurers: If there is other valid coverage, not with this insurer, providing benefits for the same loss on a provision of service basis or on an expense incurred basis and of which this insurer has not been given written notice prior to the occurrence or commencement of loss, the only liability under any expense incurred coverage of this policy shall be for the proportion of the loss as the amount which would otherwise have been payable under this policy plus the total of the like amounts under all the other valid coverages for the same loss of which this insurer had notice bears to the total like amounts under all valid coverages for the loss, and for the return of the portion of the premiums paid as shall exceed the pro-rata portion for the amount so determined. For the purpose of applying this provision when other coverage is on a provision of service basis, the “like amount” of the other coverage shall be taken as the amount which the services rendered would have cost in the absence of the coverage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 160, Sec. 119.)
-------------------------------------------

10369.6.

A disability policy may contain a provision in the form set forth in this section. If the provision is included in a policy which also contains the provision set forth in Section 10369.5, there shall be added to its caption the phrase, “***other benefits.” The insurer may, at its option, include in this provision a definition of “other valid coverage,” approved as to form by the commissioner. The definition shall be limited in subject matter to coverage provided by organizations subject to regulation by insurance law or by insurance authorities of this or any other state of the United States or any province of Canada, and to any other coverage the inclusion of which may be approved by the commissioner. In the absence of that definition the terms shall not include group insurance, or benefits provided by union welfare plans or by employer or employee benefit organizations. For the purpose of applying this policy provision with respect to any insured, any amount of benefit provided for the insured pursuant to any compulsory benefit statute, including any workers’ compensation or employers’ liability statute, whether provided by a governmental agency or otherwise, shall in all cases be deemed to be “other valid coverage” of which the insurer has had notice. In applying this provision, no third party liability coverage shall be included as “other valid coverage.”

Insurance With Other Insurers: If there is other valid coverage, not with this insurer, providing benefits for the same loss on other than an expense incurred basis and of which this insurer has not been given written notice prior to the occurrence or commencement of loss, the only liability for the benefits under this policy shall be for the proportion of the indemnities otherwise provided under this policy for the loss as the like indemnities of which the insurer had notice, including the indemnities under this policy, bear to the total amount of all like indemnities for the loss, and for the return of the portion of the premium paid as shall exceed the pro rata portion for the indemnities thus determined.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 160, Sec. 120.)
-------------------------------------------

10369.7.

A noncancellable disability policy may contain a provision in the form set forth herein. The insurer may, at its option, include in this provision a definition of “valid loss of time coverage,” approved as to form by the commissioner, which definition shall be limited in subject matter to coverage provided by governmental agencies or by organizations subject to regulation by insurance law or by insurance authorities of this or any other state of the United States or any province of Canada, or to any other coverage the inclusion of which may be approved by the commissioner or any combination of such coverages. In the absence of such definition such term shall not include any coverage provided for such insured pursuant to any compulsory benefit statute (including any workmen’s compensation or employers’ liability statute), or benefits provided by union welfare plans or by employer or employee benefit organizations.

Relation of Earnings to Insurance: If the total monthly amount of loss of time benefits promised for the same loss under all valid loss of time coverage upon the insured, whether payable on a weekly or monthly basis, shall exceed the monthly earnings of the insured at the time disability commenced or his average monthly earnings for the period of two years immediately preceding a disability for which claim is made, whichever is the greater, the insurer will be liable only for such proportionate amount of such benefits under this policy as the amount of such monthly earnings or such average monthly earnings of the insured bears to the total amount of monthly benefits for the same loss under all such coverage upon the insured at the time such disability commences and for the return of such part of the premiums paid during such two years as shall exceed the pro-rata amount of the premiums for the benefits actually paid hereunder; but this shall not operate to reduce the total monthly amount of benefits payable under all such coverage upon the insured below the sum of two hundred dollars ($200) or the sum of the monthly benefits specified in such coverages, whichever is the lesser, nor shall it operate to reduce benefits other than those payable for loss of time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 570.)
-------------------------------------------

10369.8.

A disability policy may contain a provision in the form set forth herein.

Unpaid Premium: Upon the payment of a claim under this policy, any premium then due and unpaid or covered by any note or written order may be deducted therefrom.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 570.)
-------------------------------------------

10369.9.

A disability policy may contain a provision in the form set forth herein.

Cancellation: The insurer may cancel this policy at any time by written notice delivered to the insured, or mailed to his last address as shown by the records of the insurer, stating when, not less than five days thereafter, such cancellation shall be effective; and after the policy has been continued beyond its original term the insured may cancel this policy at any time by written notice delivered or mailed to the insurer, effective upon receipt or on such later date as may be specified in such notice. In the event of cancellation, the insurer will return promptly the unearned portion of any premium paid. If the insured cancels, the earned premium shall be computed by the use of the short-rate table last filed with the state official having supervision of insurance in the state where the insured resided when the policy was issued. If the insurer cancels, the earned premium shall be computed pro rata. Cancellation shall be without prejudice to any claim originating prior to the effective date of cancellation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 570.)
-------------------------------------------

10369.10.

A disability policy may contain a provision in the form set forth herein.

Conformity With State Statutes: Any provision of this policy which, on its effective date, is in conflict with the statutes of the state in which the insured resides on such date is hereby amended to conform to the minimum requirements of such statutes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 570.)
-------------------------------------------

10369.11.

A disability policy may contain a provision in the form set forth herein.

Illegal Occupation: The insurer shall not be liable for any loss to which a contributing cause was the insured’s commission of or attempt to commit a felony or to which a contributing cause was the insured’s being engaged in an illegal occupation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 570.)
-------------------------------------------

10369.12.

(a) A disability policy may contain a provision in the form set forth herein.

Intoxicants and controlled substances: The insurer shall not be liable for any loss sustained or contracted in consequence of the insured’s being intoxicated or under the influence of any controlled substance unless administered on the advice of a physician.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to a health insurance policy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 630, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Interpretation of Policy [10380. - 10390.]

10380.

The falsity of any statement in the application for any policy covered by this chapter shall not bar the right to recovery under the policy unless such false statement was made with actual intent to deceive or unless it materially affected either the acceptance of the risk or the hazard assumed by the insurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1209, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

10381.

The following shall not operate as a waiver of any of the rights of the insurer in defense of any claim arising under such disability policy:

(a) The acknowledgment by any insurer of the receipt of notice given under any policy covered by this chapter.

(b) The furnishing of forms for filing proofs of loss.

(c) The acceptance of such proofs.

(d) The investigation of any claim thereunder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 570.)
-------------------------------------------

10381.5.

The insured shall not be bound by any statement made in an application for a policy unless a copy of such application is attached to or endorsed on the policy when issued as a part thereof. If any such policy delivered or issued for delivery to any person in this State shall be reinstated or renewed, and the insured or the beneficiary or assignee of such policy shall make written request to the insurer for a copy of the application, if any, for such reinstatement or renewal, the insurer shall within 15 days after the receipt of such request at its home office or any branch office of the insurer, deliver or mail to the person making such request, a copy of such application. If such copy shall not be so delivered or mailed, the insurer shall be precluded from introducing such application as evidence in any action or proceeding based upon or involving such policy or its reinstatement or renewal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 570.)
-------------------------------------------

10382.

No alteration of any written application for any disability policy shall be made by any person other than the applicant without his written consent except that insertions may be made by the insurer, for administrative purposes only, in such manner as to indicate clearly that such insertions are not to be ascribed to the applicant. The making of any other alteration without the consent of the applicant is a misdemeanor. If such alteration is made by any officer of the insurer, or by any employee of the insurer with the insurer’s knowledge or consent, such alteration is deemed to be performed by the insurer issuing the policy upon such altered application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 570.)
-------------------------------------------

10383.

If any disability policy contains a provision establishing, as an age limit or otherwise, a date after which the coverage provided by the policy will not be effective, and if such date falls within a period for which premium is accepted by the insurer or if the insurer accepts a premium after such date, the coverage provided by the policy will continue in force subject to any right of cancellation until the end of the period for which premium has been accepted. In the event the age of the insured has been misstated and if, according to the correct age of the insured, the coverage provided by the policy would not have become effective, or would have ceased prior to the acceptance of such premium or premiums, then the liability of the insurer shall be limited to the refund, upon request, of all premiums paid for the period not covered by the policy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 570.)
-------------------------------------------

10384.

No insurer issuing or providing any policy of disability insurance covering hospital, medical, or surgical expenses shall engage in the practice of postclaims underwriting. For purposes of this section, “postclaims underwriting” means the rescinding, canceling, or limiting of a policy or certificate due to the insurer’s failure to complete medical underwriting and resolve all reasonable questions arising from written information submitted on or with an application before issuing the policy or certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1210, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

10384.17.

(a) A health insurer shall not rescind a health insurance policy, or limit any provisions of a health insurance policy, once an insured is covered under the policy unless the insurer can demonstrate that the insured has performed an act or practice constituting fraud or made an intentional misrepresentation of material fact as prohibited by the terms of the policy.

(b) If a health insurer intends to rescind a health insurance policy pursuant to subdivision (a), the insurer shall send a notice to the policyholder or insured via regular certified mail at least 30 days prior to the effective date of the rescission explaining the reasons for the intended rescission and notifying the policyholder or insured of his or her
 right to appeal that decision to the commissioner pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 10273.4.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 10273.4 or any other provision of law, after 24 months following the issuance of a health insurance policy, a health insurer shall not rescind the policy for any reason, and shall not cancel the policy, limit any of the provisions of the policy, or raise premiums on the policy due to any omissions, misrepresentations, or inaccuracies in the application form, whether willful or not. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to alter existing law that otherwise applies to a health insurer within the first 24 months following the issuance of a health insurance policy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 658, Sec. 14.   (AB 2470)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

10385.

Compensation of a person or entity employed by, or contracted with, a disability insurer shall not be based on, or related in any way to, the number of policies or certificates for health insurance that the person or entity has caused or recommended to be rescinded, canceled, or limited, or the resulting cost savings to the insurer. A disability insurer shall not set performance goals or quotas, or provide compensation to any person or entity employed by, or contracted with, the insurer, based on the number of persons whose health insurance coverage is rescinded or any financial savings to the insurer associated with rescission of coverage.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 188, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10390.

A policy delivered or issued for delivery to any person in this State in violation of this chapter shall be held valid but shall be construed as provided in this chapter. When any provision in such a policy is in conflict with any provision of this chapter, the rights, duties and obligations of the insurer, the insured and the beneficiary shall be governed by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 570.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Exemption [10395. - 10395.]

10395.

The provisions of Sections 800, 801, 802, 803, and 804 shall not apply to disability insurance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 676, Sec. 198.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Penalties [10400. - 10402.1.]

10400.

Any person willfully violating any provision of this chapter or order of the commissioner made in accordance therewith shall forfeit to the people of this state a sum not to exceed one hundred eighteen dollars ($118) for each such violation, which sum may be recovered by civil action. The commissioner may also suspend or revoke the license of an insurer or agent for any such willful violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 770, Sec. 16.3.)
-------------------------------------------

10401.

Any incorporated insurer admitted for disability insurance and any agent of such insurer, that makes or permits any discrimination between insureds of the same class in any manner whatsoever with relation to such insurance, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

The payment to insureds by an insurer of alternative rates of payment negotiated and contracted for with institutional providers shall not constitute a violation of this section.

On and after July 1, 1983, the amendments made to this section during the 1982 portion of the 1981–82 Regular Session, shall also be applicable with respect to both professional and institutional providers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 329, Sec. 8.5.)
-------------------------------------------

10402.

Any person who, without the prior authorization of an insurer or plan solicits a provider to enter into a contract for alternative rates under Section 10133 or 11512 of this code on behalf of such insurer or plan shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.
